Wyoming, session 2026, HB0173.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-2-203(a), 14-3-438, 14-6-242,
14-6-244(b) and (d), 14-6-438, 21-4-105 and
21-4-314(b)(ix), (x) and by creating a new paragraph (xi)
are amended to read:

14-2-203. Parental tort liability for property damage
of certain minors; exception; action cumulative.

HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345
(a) Any property owner, including a public school
district in the state, is entitled to recover damages from
the parents of any minor under the age of seventeen (17)
years and over the age of ten (10) years who maliciously
and willfully damages or destroys his the owner's property.
The recovery is limited to the actual damages in an amount
not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) five
thousand dollars ($5,000.00) in addition to taxable court
costs. This section does shall not apply to parents whose
parental custody and control of the child had been
terminated by court order prior to the destructive act.

14-3-438. Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon
its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county
attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child's
parent, parents, or guardian or any other person who
willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to obey or
perform any order or provision of this act is liable for
contempt of court and may be fined not more than five
hundred dollars ($500.00) one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)
HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345
or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) one hundred
twenty (120) days, or both.

14-6-242. Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon
its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county
attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child,
child's parent, parents, or guardian or any other person
who willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to obey or
perform any order or provision of this act is liable for
contempt of court and may be fined not more than five
hundred dollars ($500.00) one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)
or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) one hundred
twenty (120) days, or both.

14-6-244. Parental liability for failure to exercise
reasonable control and authority.

(b) If the court finds at the hearing of a juvenile
petition that the parent or guardian having custody of the
child has failed or neglected to subject the juvenile to
reasonable parental control and authority, and that such
HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345
failure or neglect is the proximate cause of the act or
acts of the juvenile upon which a finding of delinquency is
based, the court may, if the child is placed on probation,
require the parent or guardian to furnish a cash deposit or
bond in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars
($500.00) one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), conditioned
upon the faithful discharge of the conditions of the
child's probation.

(d) Funds received upon forfeiture of a cash deposit
or bond under subsection (c) of this section shall be
applied in payment of damages, if any, which may have been
caused by the juvenile, including payment to a school
district damaged by the juvenile's act or acts. The
balance of the proceeds shall be retained by the court to
apply to any future damages resulting from the act or acts
of the juvenile until the juvenile reaches eighteen (18)
years of age at which time any remaining proceeds shall be:

(i) Paid into the county treasury to the credit
of the public school fund of the county if the court finds
that the juvenile has violated any material term of
probation;
HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345

(ii) Returned to the parent or guardian if the
juvenile has abided by the terms of probation.

14-6-438. Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon
its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county
attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child,
the child's parent, parents, or guardian or any other
person who willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to
obey or perform any order or provision of this act is
liable for contempt of court and may be fined not more than
five hundred dollars ($500.00) one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) one
hundred twenty (120) days, or both.

21-4-105. Penalty for failure of parent, guardian or
custodian to comply with article.

Any parent, guardian or custodian of any child to whom this
article applies who willfully fails, neglects or refuses to
comply with the provisions of this article may be punished
HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345
by not more than ten (10) twenty-five (25) days of
community service and subject to proceedings under the
Child Protection Act, W.S. 14-3-401 et seq., or the
Children In Need of Supervision Act, W.S. 14-6-401 et seq.,
or both.

21-4-314. School district implementation; state
policies, training and technical assistance.

(b) The policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation
or bullying shall include, without limitation:

(ix) A process for discussing the district's
harassment, intimidation or bullying policy with students
that shall be reviewed and updated annually; and

(x) A statement of how the policy is to be
publicized, including notice that the policy applies to
participation in functions sponsored by the school;. and

(xi) Consequences and appropriate remedial
actions, including a referral to law enforcement, for
parents or guardians of minor students who have committed
HB0173

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0345
acts of harassment, intimidation or bullying or engaged in
reprisal or retaliation where the acts were, in part, a
result of the parent's or guardian's neglect or refusal to
discipline the minor student for the acts.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0173